Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0865.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of military
and veterans affairs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027,
from the following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


Full-time equated unclassified positions 9.0
Full-time equated classified positions 967.0
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 263,938,000
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 101,800
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 263,836,200
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 154,412,200
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 100,000
Total other state restricted revenues 12,973,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 96,350,900
Sec. 102. MILITARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 9.0
Full-time equated classified positions 422.5
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 9.0 $ 1,934,400
Headquarters and armories--FTEs 103.0 24,312,800
Michigan youth challeNGe academy--FTEs 68.0 10,974,700
Military family relief fund 150,000
Military retirement 2,585,600
Military training sites and support facilities-
-FTEs 240.0 47,066,500
National guard operations 600,500
Michigan national guard member benefit fund--
FTEs 11.5 11,278,600
Starbase grant 2,322,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 101,225,100
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG - state police 101,800
Federal revenues:
DOD - DOA - NGB 66,608,700
Federal counternarcotics revenues 100,000
Special revenue funds:
Private donations 90,000
Billeting fund 1,378,500
Military family relief fund 150,000
Morale, welfare, and recreation fund 100,000
Rental fund 187,700
Test project fund 100,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 32,408,400
Sec. 103. MICHIGAN VETERANS AFFAIRS AGENCY
Full-time equated classified positions 61.0
County veteran service grants--FTEs 2.0 $ 4,255,500
Michigan veterans affairs agency
administration--FTEs 49.0 8,491,000
Veterans trust fund administration--FTEs 8.0 1,197,000
Veterans trust fund grants 2,500,000
Veterans service grants--FTEs 2.0 4,255,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 20,699,000
Appropriated from:
USDVA - VHA 758,800
Special revenue funds:
Private donations 10,000
Michigan veterans trust fund 3,697,000
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


Veterans license plate fund 50,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 16,183,200
Sec. 104. MICHIGAN VETERANS' FACILITY AUTHORITY
Full-time equated classified positions 483.5
Chesterfield Township home for veterans--FTEs 110.0 $ 34,948,800
D.J. Jacobetti home for veterans--FTEs 179.0 26,759,200
Grand Rapids home for veterans--FTEs 176.0 40,244,700
Information technology services and projects 1,749,600
Michigan veteran homes administration--FTEs 18.0 4,972,000
Veterans cemetery--FTEs 0.5 134,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 108,808,800
Appropriated from:
USDVA - VHA 46,653,700
HHS – HCFA, Medicare, hospital insurance 1,345,400
HHS – HCFA title XIX, Medicaid 8,781,300
Special revenue funds:
Income and assessments 6,309,900
State general fund/general purpose $ 45,718,500
Sec. 105. CAPITAL OUTLAY
Armory maintenance $ 1,000,000
Land and acquisitions 1,000,000
Special maintenance - National Guard 30,000,000
Special maintenance - veterans' homes 500,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 32,500,000
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DOD - DOA - NGB 30,000,000
Special revenue funds:
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


Michigan national guard construction fund 1,000,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,500,000
Sec. 106. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 705,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 705,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DOD - DOA - NGB 164,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 540,800

PART 1A
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026
Sec. 150. There is appropriated for the department of military
and veterans affairs to supplement appropriations for the fiscal
year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 0.0
Full-time equated classified positions 0.0
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,000
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 0
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,800
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 0
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


Total private revenues 0
Total other state restricted revenues 152,000,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 151. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Selfridge Air National Guard base $ 152,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,000
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
State restricted revenue 152,000,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$109,324,000.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources
to be paid to local units of government is $4,088,000.00. The
following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which
spending to local units of government will occur:
DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS
County veteran service grants $ 4,041,500
Military training sites and support facilities 46,500
TOTAL $ 4,088,000
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "CMS" means the United States Department of Health and
Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(b) "Department" means the department of military and veterans
affairs.
(c) "DHHS" means the department of health and human services.
(d) "Director" means the director of the department.
(e) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified
service of this state.
(f) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(g) "MVAA" means the Michigan veterans affairs agency created
by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2013-2, MCL 32.92.
(h) "MVFA" means the Michigan veterans' facility authority
created under section 3 of the Michigan veterans' facility
authority act, 2016 PA 560, MCL 36.103.
(i) "MVH" means the Michigan veteran homes as that term is
defined in the Michigan veterans' facility authority act, 2016 PA
560, MCL 36.102.
(j) "MYCA" means the Michigan youth challeNGe academy.
(k) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
appropriations subcommittees on the department budget, the senate
and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and
the state budget office.
(l) "USDVA" means the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs.
(m) "USDVA-VHA" means the USDVA Veterans Health
Administration.
(n) "Veterans' facility" means that term as defined in section
2 of the Michigan veterans' facility authority act, 2016 PA 560,
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


MCL 36.102.
(o) "VSO" means veterans service organization.
(p) "Work project" means that term as defined in section 404
of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1404, and
that meets the criteria in section 451a(1) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a.
Sec. 204. A department or agency shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each
report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by
fiscal year in the same single archivable location. The department
or agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other
required recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department or a state agency for
communicating with a member of the legislature or legislative
staff, unless the communication is prohibited by law and the
department or agency is exercising its authority as provided by
law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department and each
agency receiving appropriations part 1 shall prepare a report on
out-of-state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report
must list all travel by classified and unclassified employees
outside this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in
whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's or
agency's budget. The department or agency shall submit the report
to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house
appropriations committees. The report must include all of the
following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related expenses of each
travel occurrence and the proportion funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, local revenues, and private revenues, including specific
sources of state restricted, federal, local, and private revenues.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall transmit the report to the standard report
recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $8,600,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. These funds are not available
for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line
item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,100,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. These funds are not available
for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line
item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $250,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. These funds are not available for
expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item
in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act,
1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. These funds are not available for
expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act,
1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 211. (1) The department or agency shall cooperate with
the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a
searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that
includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the
department or each agency:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
(2) The department shall cooperate with the department of
technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website
on a quarterly basis.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 213. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of a local health officer.
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


Sec. 214. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, inter-transfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 215. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract
with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises
for services, supplies, or both. As used in this section,
"geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term
as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-1.
Sec. 216. On a quarterly basis, the department or agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall report on the number of
full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service
classification, including a comparison by line item of the number
of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated
in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions
employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. The
report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to
the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 217. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026
and any subsequent financial close out period.
Sec. 218. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-
2, must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and
reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and the
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification
must include the authorized program under which funds were
originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the
funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.
Sec. 219. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 220. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit
the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and
house appropriations committees, and to the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 222. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 223. Funds appropriated in part 1 for capital outlay must
be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year consistent with
section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1248.
Sec. 224. If the department intends to sell any department
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


real property, the department shall submit notification of that
intent to the standard report recipients 60 days before the public
announcement of that intention.
Sec. 225. The department shall provide biannual reports that
include the following data:
(a) A list of all major work projects, including a status
report of each project.
(b) The department's financial status, featuring a report of
budgeted versus actual expenditures by part 1 line item, including
a year-end projection of budget requirements.
(c) The number of active employees at the close of the
reporting period by job classification and departmental branch of
service.
Sec. 226. (1) Not later than 30 days after enactment of this
act, the house of representatives and senate shall provide to the
state budget office a jointly agreed-upon list of legislatively
directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in section 364
of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.364. The list
must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded
items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and
364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.364 and
18.364a.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 227. (1) Money privately donated to the department in
excess of the appropriation in part 1 is appropriated and available
for expenditure for departmental operations and for the purpose
designated by the private source, if specified.
(2) Any unexpended and unencumbered private donations to
support the department at the close of this fiscal year do not
lapse to the general fund and must be carried forward to the
subsequent fiscal year.
(3) If a private donation received is $10,000.00 or more, the
department must submit a report within 14 calendar days after
receiving that donation that provides the amount of the donation
and the purpose for which the money will be expended, if known.
Sec. 229. By April 1, the department shall provide to the
standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic plan
prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 233. (1) The department shall maximize utilization of the
department's in-person state workforce. The department shall
prioritize occupancy utilization of office space for each division
within the department. Employees with job responsibilities that
require the employees to serve in their capacities outside of an
office shall be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours
reported on the timesheet were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set by the
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and
occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher, subject to market
conditions.
(3) The department shall adhere to the rules and regulations
of civil service, which state that the standard biweekly work
period for a full-time employee in the classified service of this
state is the equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall
establish policies and processes to ensure all employees are
working their jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 235. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, the department shall submit an
annual report that summarizes all work project accounts. The report
must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 236. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $9,082,500.00. From this amount, total
appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department
are estimated at $9,082,500.00. Total appropriations for retiree
health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 237. Not later than November 15, the department shall
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount of funding received, the
specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding
was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. The department
shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to
the chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 239. A department or agency that receives an
appropriation under this part or part 1 must provide an annual
report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following:
(a) Affect the operations of the department, including
reductions in federal revenue. For federal revenue reductions, the
annual report must detail the impact on the department or agency
and residents of this state, including, but not limited to, all of
the following information:
(i) The amount of additional state revenue required to replace
the lost federal revenue.
(ii) The services the department or agency will have to reduce
or eliminate due to the lost revenue.
(iii) The anticipated fiscal impact on residents of this state.
(b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group
regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the
department or agency.
(c) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the
public.
(d) Increase the department's or agency's costs.
(e) Reduce or eliminate a program that provides services to
residents of this state.
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


Sec. 240. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 241. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
must do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department in the previous fiscal year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose or
purposes.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the house
and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose or purposes.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) The type or types of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount or amounts of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose or purposes of the funding.
(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar time frame as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.

MILITARY
Sec. 301. (1) Not later than October 30, the department shall
report a list of the current unclassified positions, which shall
include the official titles and responsibilities of each position.
(2) Upon the department being granted a request for an
additional unclassified employee position from the civil service
commission, or for any substantive changes to the duties of an
existing unclassified employee position, the department shall
report on these changes within 15 days.
Sec. 302. (1) The department shall operate and maintain
National Guard armories and implement a system to measure the
condition and adequacy of those armories.
(2) Not later than January 15, the department shall evaluate
armories and submit an annual report on the status of the armories
that includes the following information:
(a) An assessment of the grounds and facilities of each armory
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


to objectively measure and determine the current facility condition
and capability to support authorized manpower, unit training, and
operations.
(b) Recommendations for the placement of new armories, the
relocation or consolidation of existing armories, or a change in
the mission of units assigned to armories to ideally position the
National Guard in current or projected population centers.
(c) Recommendations for the enhanced use of armories to
facilitate family support programs during deployments.
(d) An analysis of the feasibility, potential costs, and
benefits of use of armories shared with other local, state, or
federal agencies to improve responses to local emergencies as well
as the community support provided to armories.
(e) An investment strategy and proposed funding amounts in a
prioritized project list to correct the most critical facility
shortfalls across the inventory of armories in this state.
(f) A review of the status of construction activities and
expenditures of the armory modernization project funded in section
107 of article 10 of 2022 PA 166 and section 104 of 2022 PA 194.
Sec. 303. (1) The department shall maintain the MYCA to
provide values, skills, education, and self-discipline instruction
for at-risk youth as provided under 32 USC 509.
(2) The department shall take steps to recruit candidates to
the MYCA from economically disadvantaged areas, including those
with low-income and high-unemployment backgrounds.
(3) The department shall partner with the DHHS to identify
youth who may be eligible for MYCA from those youth served by DHHS
services programs. The department shall give these eligible youth
priority for enrollment.
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


(4) The department shall maintain the MYCA to graduate at
least the target number of graduates consistent with the state's
cooperative agreement with the National Guard Bureau regarding
program operations.
(5) The department shall monitor individual academic success
as measured by the number of individuals who have received a
general equivalency diploma, high school diploma, or high school
credit recovery or by the improvement of tests of adult basic
education scores, or both.
(6) Any unexpended and unencumbered private donations to
support the MYCA at the close of this fiscal year do not lapse to
the general fund and must be carried forward to the subsequent
fiscal year.
Sec. 304. (1) Not later than January 15, the department shall
provide a report on the revenues, expenditures, and fund balance of
the military family relief fund. The department shall itemize
expenditures in the report by purpose, including, but not limited
to, for advertising and assistance grants. The report must also
include information on the number of applications for assistance
received, approved, and denied for the previous fiscal year.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department
shall provide outreach to the Michigan families of members of the
reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States called
into active duty on the availability of assistance through the
military family relief fund.
Sec. 305. (1) The department shall do all of the following:
(a) Provide Army and Air National Guard forces, when directed,
for state and local emergencies and in support of national military
requirements.
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


(b) Operate and maintain Army National Guard training
facilities, including Fort Custer and Camp Grayling.
(c) Maintain a system that measures the condition and adequacy
of air facilities using both quality and functionality criteria.
(d) Operate and maintain Air National Guard air bases,
including Selfridge Air National Guard base, Battle Creek Air
National Guard base, and Alpena combat readiness training center.
(2) Not later than March 1, the department shall report the
following information for the previous calendar year:
(a) The apportioned and assigned strength of the Michigan Army
National Guard.
(b) The apportioned and assigned strength of the Michigan Air
National Guard.
(c) Recruiting, retention, and attrition data, including
measurement against stated performance goals, for the Michigan Army
National Guard.
(d) Recruiting, retention, and attrition data, including
measurement against stated performance goals, for the Michigan Air
National Guard.
Sec. 306. (1) The billeting fund is created within the state
treasury.
(2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets
received from any source into the fund. The state treasurer shall
direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and
earnings from the investments to the fund.
(3) All of the fees and other revenues generated from the
operation of the chargeable transient quarters program must be
deposited in the fund.
(4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund.
(5) The department is the administrator of the fund for
auditing purposes.
(6) The department shall expend money from the fund to support
program operations and the maintenance and operations of the
chargeable transient quarters program as appropriated in part 1.
(7) Not later than January 15, the department shall submit an
annual report of operations and expenditures regarding the fund for
the previous fiscal year.
Sec. 307. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
Michigan National Guard member benefit program, the department
shall maintain a Michigan National Guard tuition assistance program
as provided under the Michigan National Guard tuition assistance
act, 2014 PA 259, MCL 32.431 to 32.434. The Michigan National Guard
tuition assistance program must do all of the following:
(a) Bolster military readiness by increasing recruitment and
retention of Michigan Army and Air National Guard members.
(b) Fill federally authorized strength levels for the state.
(c) Improve the Michigan Army and Air National Guard's
competitive draw from other military enlistment options in the
state.
(d) Enhance the ability of the Michigan Army and Air National
Guard to compete for guard members and federal dollars with
surrounding states.
(e) Increase the pool of eligible candidates within the
Michigan Army and Air National Guard to become commissioned
officers.
(2) The department shall make efforts to increase the number
of National Guard members who have received a credential or are
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


still enrolled in the Michigan National Guard tuition assistance
program after their initial term of enlistment. To evaluate the
effectiveness of the program, the department shall monitor the
number of new recruits and new reenlistments and the percentage of
those who become participants in the program to determine whether
the percentage of authorized Michigan Army and Air National Guard
strength obtained and retained is competitive in comparison with
the neighboring army and air national guards from Illinois,
Indiana, Ohio, and Wisconsin.
(3) Not later than March 1, the department shall provide a
report on the Michigan National Guard tuition assistance program.
The report must include, but is not limited to, the following
information for the previous fiscal year:
(a) The number of guard members, spouses, children, and
dependents that received tuition assistance, broken down by the
number of each type of recipient.
(b) The educational institutions from which those guard
members, spouses, children, and dependents received education or
training under the program, broken down by the number of each type
of recipient and each type of educational or training program for
which tuition assistance was received.
(c) The total amount of financial assistance received by each
educational institution.
(d) The total funds expended on the program for financial
assistance for each type of recipient and each type of educational
or training program.
(e) The total funds expended on the program for administrative
costs of the department.
(f) For each FTE position appropriated in part 1 for the
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


Michigan National Guard tuition assistance program, a description
of the position's functions, assigned responsibilities, and, if
applicable, the length of time that the position has been vacant.
(g) The total number of applications for tuition assistance
approved and denied.
(h) The number of guard members, spouses, children, and
dependents receiving tuition assistance who successfully completed
an educational or training program for which tuition assistance was
received.
(i) A description of each educational or training program
offered through the Michigan National Guard tuition assistance
program.
(j) A list of any educational institutions and training
programs removed from eligibility and the rationale for that
removal.
(k) An explanation of any identified barriers to the
successful utilization of the program, or other unmet needs of the
program and applicable proposals for legislative action to address
those barriers and needs.
Sec. 308. The department shall maintain the starbase program
at Air National Guard facilities, as provided under 10 USC 2193b,
to improve the knowledge, skills, and interest of students,
primarily in the fifth grade, in math, science, and technology. The
starbase program is to specifically target minority and at-risk
students for participation.
Sec. 309. (1) The National Guard test projects fund is created
within the state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets
received from any source into the fund. The state treasurer shall
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and
earnings from the investments to the fund.
(3) All of the fees and other revenues generated from the
operation of the test projects program shall be deposited in the
fund.
(4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains
in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund.
(5) The department is the administrator of the fund for
auditing purposes.
(6) Money in the fund shall be available for expenditure for
the support of program operations as appropriated in part 1.
Sec. 310. (1) The morale, welfare, and recreation fund is
created within the state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets
received from any source into the fund. The state treasurer shall
direct the investment of money in the fund and shall credit
interest and earnings from the investments to the fund.
(3) The department is the administrator of the fund for
auditing purposes.
(4) All of the fees and other revenues generated from the
operation of the morale, welfare, and recreation program must be
deposited in the morale, welfare, and recreation fund. Money in the
fund is available for expenditure for the support of program
operations as appropriated in part 1.
(5) Money remaining in the fund at the close of the fiscal
year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund.
Sec. 311. (1) The National Guard facilities rental fund is
created in the state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


received from any source into the fund. The state treasurer shall
direct the investment of money in the fund and shall credit
interest and earnings from the investments to the fund.
(3) All of the fees and other revenues generated from the
operation of the National Guard facilities rental program must be
deposited in the fund.
(4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains
in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund.
(5) The department is the administrator of the fund for
auditing purposes.
(6) Money in the fund is available for expenditure for the
support of program operations as appropriated in part 1.
Sec. 312. Not later than February 1, the department shall
provide the report required under section 251(7) of the Michigan
military act, 1967 PA 150, MCL 32.651.
Sec. 313. The Michigan Army National Guard and Air National
Guard shall work to provide a culture that is free of sexual
assault, through an environment of prevention, education and
training, response capability, victim support, reporting
procedures, and appropriate accountability that enhances the safety
and well-being of all guard members.
Sec. 314. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
Michigan National Guard member benefit fund, the department shall
create and administer a Tricare premium reimbursement program, as
provided under the Tricare premium reimbursement program act, 2025
PA 36, MCL 32.471 to 32.475.
(2) Not later than March 1, the department shall provide a
report on the Tricare premium reimbursement program. The report
must include, but is not limited to, the following information:
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


(a) The number of eligible members receiving assistance under
the program, broken down by service branch and including the amount
of the assistance issued, and the total number of National Guard
members by service branch.
(b) The total funds expended on Tricare premium
reimbursements.
(c) The total funds expended on the program for administrative
costs of the department.
(d) Any other pertinent information, as determined by the
department, on the program's operations and administration.
Sec. 315. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
Michigan National Guard member benefit fund, the department shall
create and administer a child care assistance program as provided
under the Michigan National Guard child care assistance act, 2025
PA 37, MCL 32.451 to 32.455.
(2) Not later than March 1, the department shall provide a
report on the Michigan National Guard child care assistance
program. The report must include, but is not limited to, the
following information:
(a) The number of eligible members receiving child care
assistance under the program, broken down by service branch and
including the amount of the stipend issued, and the total number of
National Guard members by service branch.
(b) The number of children for whom a stipend was paid and the
associated number of hours paid broken down by service branch.
(c) The hourly rate paid.
(d) The total funds expended on the program for child care
stipends.
(e) The total funds expended on the program for administrative
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


costs of the department.
(f) Any other pertinent information, as determined by the
department, on the program's operations and administration.
Sec. 316. (1) The general fund/general purpose funds
appropriated in part 1 for the Michigan National Guard member
benefit fund must be deposited into the restricted Michigan
National Guard member benefit fund. All funds in the restricted
Michigan National Guard member benefit fund are appropriated and
available for expenditure to support the Michigan National Guard's
tuition assistance program, Tricare premium reimbursement program,
and child care assistance program.
(2) As used in this section, "Michigan National Guard member
benefit fund" means the Michigan National Guard member benefit fund
created in section 3 of the Michigan National Guard member benefit
fund act, 2025 PA 31, MCL 32.493.

MICHIGAN VETERANS AFFAIRS AGENCY
Sec. 405. (1) The Michigan veterans' trust fund board together
with the MVAA shall provide emergency grants for disbursement from
the Michigan veterans' trust fund, as provided under the following
program authorities:
(a) Sections 37, 38, and 39 of article IX of the state
constitution of 1963.
(b) 1946 (1st Ex Sess) PA 9, MCL 35.602 to 35.610.
(c) R 35.1 to R 35.7 of the Michigan Administrative Code.
(d) R 35.621 to R 35.623 of the Michigan Administrative Code.
(2) Not later than January 15 , the MVAA shall provide a
detailed report of the Michigan veterans' trust fund that includes,
for the previous fiscal year, the following information:
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


(a) Details concerning the methodology of allocations and the
selection of emergency grant program authorized agents.
(b) A description of how the emergency grant program is
administered in each county.
(c) A detailed breakdown of the Michigan veterans' trust fund
expenditures for the emergency grant program, including the amount
distributed to each county for operating costs, administrative
costs and emergency grants.
(d) Expenditures for state operating costs and administrative
costs.
(e) The number of approved emergency grant applications, by
category of assistance, and the number of denied applications, by
reason of denial.
(f) A description of the MVAA's efforts to reduce program
administrative costs and maintain the Michigan veterans' trust fund
corpus at or above its original amount of $50,000,000.00.
(g) The overall financial status of the Michigan veterans'
trust fund, including revenues and year-end balance.
(h) Expenditures for program partnerships, delineated by
organization, and expenditures for any other program initiatives.
Sec. 406. The MVAA shall do all of the following:
(a) Provide outreach services to Michigan veterans to advise
them on the benefits to which they are entitled, as provided under
Executive Reorganization Order No. 2013-2, MCL 32.92.
(b) Develop and operate an outreach program that communicates
benefit eligibility information to at least 50% of Michigan's
population of veterans, as assessed by annual census estimates,
with a goal of reaching 100% and enabling 100% to access benefit
information online.
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


(c) Communicate veteran benefit information pertaining to the
Michigan military family relief fund, Michigan veterans' trust
fund, and USDVA health, financial, and memorial benefits to which
veterans are entitled.
(d) Fulfill requests for military discharge certificates (DD-
214) upon request.
(e) Not later than March 1, submit a report providing, to the
extent known, data on the estimated number of homeless veterans, by
county, in this state.
(f) Not later than March 1, submit a report on the percentage
of Michigan veterans contacted through its outreach programs, with
a goal of 90%, and report that percentage on the status of
outreach.
Sec. 408. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MVAA
shall provide for the regional coordination of services and do all
of the following:
(a) Coordinate with veteran benefit counselors throughout a
specified region.
(b) Coordinate services with all state departments and
agencies.
(c) Coordinate with regional workforce and economic
development agencies.
(d) Coordinate activities among local foundations, nonprofit
organizations, and community groups to improve accessibility,
enrollment, and utilization of the array of health care, education,
employment assistance, and quality of life services provided at the
local level.
(e) Work with MVAA service officers, county veteran
counselors, VSO service officers, and other service providers to
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


increase awareness of available mental health care resources and
support services veterans may be eligible to receive.
(f) Coordinate with the DHHS to identify Medicaid recipients
who are veterans and who may be eligible for federal veterans
health care benefits or other benefits, to the extent that the
identification does not violate applicable confidentiality
requirements.
(g) Collaborate with the department of corrections to create
and maintain a process by which prisoners can obtain a copy of
their DD-214 form or other military discharge documentation if
necessary.
(h) Ensure that all MVAA service officers and VSO service
officers receive appropriate training in processing applications
for benefits payable to veterans due to military sexual trauma,
post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, anxiety, substance use
disorder, or other mental health issues.
(i) Not later than March 1, submit a report on the activities
and outcomes of its outreach services, including the percentage of
Michigan veterans contacted through its outreach programs.
Sec. 410. (1) The MVAA shall provide claims processing
services to Michigan veterans in support of benefit claims
submitted to the USDVA for the health, financial, and memorial
benefits for which they are eligible. The MVAA shall report
annually on the number of benefit claims, by type, submitted to the
USDVA by MVAA and maintain the staffing and resources necessary to
process a minimum of 500 claims per year.
(2) The MVAA shall develop and implement a process to ensure
that all county veterans counselors receive the training and
accreditation necessary to provide quality services to veterans,
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


and not later than March 1, the MVAA shall provide a report for the
previous fiscal year that includes information on the number and
percentage of county veterans counselors trained by the MVAA, the
number and percentage who received funding from the MVAA to attend
training, and a description of the training provided, with an
overall goal of 100% of county veterans trained.
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for MVAA, the MVAA
is authorized to expend up to $100,000.00 to hire legal services to
represent veterans benefit cases before federal court to maintain
accreditation under 38 CFR 14.628(d)(1)(iv).
Sec. 411. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
veterans service grants, the MVAA shall establish, administer, and
award competitive grants to 1 or more congressionally chartered
VSOs or a coalition of VSOs. The MVAA shall award grants to support
efforts to connect veterans and their dependents with federal
compensation and pension benefits and state veterans' benefits,
including emergency grants through the Michigan veterans' trust
fund and other local or nonprofit assistance that may be available
to veterans and their dependents. The MVAA shall establish a
competitive grant process that satisfies all of the following:
(a) Utilizes a service provision model to provide services
across the state and can be tracked regionally to ensure that
veterans and their dependents in this state, including those within
tribal communities, are provided with services, advocacy, and
outreach as close to the communities in which they live as
possible.
(b) Ensures that grantees are providing adequate veteran
services and advocacy, through in-person and virtual meetings, that
enables the organization to meet performance goals established in
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


the grant agreement.
(c) Fosters innovative and transformative approaches and
techniques for the grantee to use when providing services,
advocacy, and outreach for veterans and their dependents.
(d) Requires grantees to use an MVAA-designated internet-based
claims data system to manage caseloads. License fees associated
with the claims data system described in this subdivision are
considered an allowable expenditure and may be reimbursed with
grant funds.
(e) Requires grantees, in coordination with the MVAA, to
provide services to incarcerated veterans who are within 1 year of
their earliest release date.
(f) Ensures that each grantee is issued performance goals.
(g) Ensures that each grantee expends grant awards as
prescribed in the grant agreement.
(h) Requires each grantee to report not less than quarterly on
all of the following:
(i) An accounting for all grant fund expenditures.
(ii) The number and type of claims originated and submitted by
the grantee to the USDVA.
(iii) The number and type of claims originated by an
organization other than the grantee and submitted by the grantee to
the USDVA.
(iv) The services provided to veterans and their dependents.
(v) Progress in achieving monthly performance benchmark goals.
(i) Ensures that each grantee is issued monthly performance
benchmark goals that each grantee must aim to achieve and require
each grantee to report to the MVAA, in order to ensure that
benchmark goals are being achieved, or on target to be achieved, in
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


the fiscal year.
(2) The MVAA shall do all of the following:
(a) Follow all generally accepted accounting principles in
accordance with sections 141 and 485 of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1141 and 18.1485.
(b) When establishing, modifying, or amending the competitive
grant process described in subsection (1), consult and collaborate
with congressionally chartered VSOs in the state, or a coalition of
VSOs, and other stakeholders to ensure a comprehensive approach to
providing services, advocacy, and outreach to veterans and their
dependents.
(c) Provide notice to current grantees of any MVAA-proposed
modifications or amendments to the competitive grant process and
provide those grantees with an opportunity to respond through
written communication.
(d) Assess the accuracy rate of claims reported by grantees.
(e) Review and audit grantees' expenditure of grant funds to
ensure compliance with the grant agreement, as provided under
section 470 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1470.
(3) Not later than January 15, the MVAA shall provide a report
summarizing grant activities for the previous fiscal year,
including the amount of expenditures, number of service and
advocacy hours, number of claims for benefits submitted by type of
claim, and other information deemed appropriate by the MVAA.
(4) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for veterans service
grants, $214,000.00 must be allocated to cover necessary
administrative and implementation costs incurred by the MVAA.
(5) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for veterans
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


service grants are designated as a work project appropriation, and
any unencumbered or unallotted funds do not lapse at the end of the
fiscal year and must be available for expenditures for projects
under this section until the projects have been completed. The
following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to administer and award
competitive grants to 1 or more congressionally chartered VSOs or a
coalition of VSOs.
(b) The project will be accomplished by state employees and
grantees.
(c) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2028.
Sec. 413. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for county
veteran service grants must be deposited into the restricted county
veteran service fund created in section 3a of 1953 PA 192, MCL
35.623a. All available funds in the restricted county veteran
service fund are appropriated and available for expenditure as
provided by law.
(2) From the restricted county veteran service fund created in
section 3a of 1953 PA 192, MCL 35.623a, $214,000.00 must be
allocated to the MVAA to cover necessary administrative and
implementation costs incurred by the MVAA.
(3) The MVAA shall provide a report not later than January 31
that includes the following information for the previous fiscal
year:
(a) A list of counties that received a grant under this
section and details concerning the methodology of allocations,
including, but not limited to, all program information distributed
by the MVAA to counties and any applicable timelines and deadlines
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


imposed by the MVAA.
(b) The base, per capita, and total amounts of grant funding
each county received under section 3a(6) of 1953 PA 192, MCL
35.623a, including any amount of funding provided under the
emergent need relief program pursuant to section 3a(10) of 1953 PA
192, MCL 35.623a.
(c) A summary of each county's expenditures of grant funding.
(d) The amount of any unexpended grant funding disbursed to
the counties that has been recovered and returned to the county
veteran service fund.
(e) The balance of the county veteran service fund at the
close of the fiscal year.
(f) A list of counties that have requested funds in the
current fiscal year, the amount requested by each county, and the
total of these amounts.
(g) A list of counties that did not request funds in the
current fiscal year.
(h) The amount of any funds recovered by the MVAA through the
MVAA's finding of misused grant funds.
(i) An explanation of any obstacles or reasons for counties
not applying for or spending their eligible amount of grant
funding.
(j) The amount expended by the MVAA for grant administration
and implementation costs.
(k) Details concerning the methodology of allocations and the
selection of emergency grant program authorized agents.
(4) The MVAA shall notify the legislature not later than 30
days after any changes, alterations, or modifications are made to
the amount of grant funding awarded to a county under section 3a of
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


1953 PA 192, MCL 35.623a.
(5) On a quarterly and annual basis, but not more than
quarterly, a county that receives grant funding under section 3a of
1953 PA 192, MCL 35.623a, shall submit a report to the MVAA that
includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:
(a) A line-item accounting of all expenditures made using
grant funds, including, but not limited to, salaries, training,
outreach, equipment, transportation, and operational expenses.
(b) A breakdown of the number of veterans served using grant
funds, including the number of veterans assisted, the types of
services provided, and the number and types of claims submitted.
(c) A comparison of the costs associated with delivering
services or products to veterans to the amount of grant funding
spent on delivering those services or products.
(d) A verification of county match funding, including
documentation that the county has maintained at least 70% of the
funding level from the previous fiscal year for veteran services.
(e) A description of how county expenditures align with the
intended outcomes of the county veteran service grant program,
including any challenges or deviations from planned activities.
(f) A certification, signed by the county veteran service
officer and a county fiscal officer, affirming that all
expenditures comply with county veteran service grant conditions
and applicable law.
(6) A county that receives grant funding under section 3a of
1953 PA 192, MCL 35.623a, shall use the grant funding only for
allowable expenditures. As used in this subsection, "allowable
expenditures" means any of the following:
(a) Payroll and salaries.
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


(b) Staff onboarding and training.
(c) Office space.
(d) Information technology and equipment.
Sec. 414. (1) The veterans service fund is created in the
state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets
received from any source in the fund. The state treasurer shall
direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and
earnings from the investments to the fund.
(3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains
in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund.
(4) The department is the administrator of the fund for
auditing purposes.
(5) The department shall expend money in the fund, as provided
by law.
Sec. 415. Not later than January 15, the MVAA shall submit a
report that includes all of the following:
(a) An analysis on the scope of homelessness among the state's
veteran population, including the estimated number of homeless
veterans, by county.
(b) Challenges to securing housing for homeless veterans.
(c) Recommendations for future long-term partnerships between
the Michigan state housing development authority, the MVAA,
municipalities, and nonprofit organizations that could assist in
eliminating homelessness among veterans in this state.
Recommendations under this subdivision must minimize additional
costs to local units of government.
(d) Activities of the MVAA in the previous fiscal year to
support homeless veterans or eliminate homelessness among veterans.
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


Sec. 416. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department may partner with the DHHS to facilitate and administer a
program to contract with or provide grants to local health care
providers to accelerate the clinical research and deployment of
promising investigational treatments for suicide prevention that
have been granted breakthrough therapy designation by the United
States Food and Drug Administration and are eligible for expanded
access as defined by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, specifically for the treatment of post-traumatic
stress disorder, major depressive disorder, or treatment-resistant
depression in veterans of the United States military and first
responders.

MICHIGAN VETERANS' FACILITY AUTHORITY
Sec. 502. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the MVH
and the MVFA shall provide compassionate and quality nursing care
services at each veterans' facility in this state so that resident
members can achieve their highest potential of wellness,
independence, self-worth, and dignity. The MVFA and the MVH shall
provide nursing care services to veterans in accordance with
federal standards and report the results of the annual USDVA and
CMS surveys and certification as proof of compliance.
(2) Appropriations in part 1 for a veterans' facility shall
not be used for any purpose other than expenses related to the
operations of the veterans' facility.
Sec. 503. All contractors providing health care services at a
veterans' facility shall provide services in a manner that complies
with applicable USDVA and CMS regulations for state veterans' homes
and skilled nursing facilities, any rules governing the operation
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


of nursing homes licensed in this state, and any training and
education requirements associated with staff licensure or
certification.
Sec. 504. (1) The MVFA shall report and investigate all
complaints of abuse or neglect at a veterans' facility in
compliance with USDVA and CMS regulations for state veterans' homes
and skilled nursing facilities. The MVFA shall report on a
bimonthly basis the following information:
(a) A description of the process by which resident members and
others may file complaints of alleged abuse or neglect at a
veterans' facility.
(b) Summary statistics on the number and general nature of
complaints of abuse or neglect.
(c) Summary statistics on the final disposition of complaints
of abuse or neglect received.
(2) The MVFA shall display in high-traffic areas throughout
the veterans' facility the process by which visitors, resident
members, and staff of the veterans' facility may register
complaints.
Sec. 505. The MVH shall do the following regarding member
care:
(a) Provide board-certified psychiatric care for all resident
members with mental health disorders in order to ensure that those
resident members receive needed services in a professional and
timely manner.
(b) Provide all resident members and staff a safe and secure
environment.
(c) Ensure that the veterans' facility effectively develops,
executes, and monitors all comprehensive care plans in accordance
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


with federal regulations and the veterans' facility's internal
policies, with a goal that a comprehensive care plan is fully
developed for all resident members.
Sec. 506. The MVH shall establish and implement internal
controls regarding all of the following:
(a) The use and management of food, maintenance, and
pharmaceutical and medical supply inventories.
(b) Calculating resident member maintenance assessments in
order to accurately calculate resident member maintenance
assessments for each billing cycle and ensure that all past due
resident member maintenance assessments are addressed within 30
days.
(c) Monetary donations and donated goods.
(d) The handling of resident member funds to ensure the
release of funds within 15 calendar days upon the resident member
leaving the home and to ensure that a representative of a resident
member is provided a full accounting of that resident member's
funds within 30 calendar days after the death of that resident
member.
(e) Financial reporting and accounting.
Sec. 507. (1) The MVH shall post on its website the following:
(a) All policies adopted by the MVFA and the veterans'
facility related to the administrative operations of the veterans'
facility.
(b) The agenda and minutes of public meetings of the MVFA
board.
(2) The MVH shall provide a report with copies of each
veterans' facility's USDVA State Veteran Home quarterly report.
These quarterly reports shall also be posted on the MVH website and
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


these reports must include statistics and information that
demonstrates the performance of MVH compared to available state and
national veterans' homes or nursing homes.
(3) Not later than January 15, the MVH shall provide a report
on the following:
(a) Census data for each veterans' facility, including
information on level of care, service era of its resident members,
payer source, and average income and assessment rate.
(b) Per patient daily care hours provided by each veterans'
facility, by level of care.
(4) The MVH shall provide a bimonthly report on the financial
status of each veterans' facility and central MVFA/MVH
administration. Information shall include, but not be limited to,
actual year-to-date and projected year-end revenues and
expenditures, by fund source.
(5) The MVH shall provide a report on the results of any
annual or for-cause survey conducted by any entity with oversight
over the veterans' facility and any corresponding corrective action
plan. This information shall also be made available publicly
through the MVH website.
(6) In addition to the information required under section
12(1) of the Michigan veterans' facility authority act, 2016 PA
560, MCL 36.112, not later than January 31, the MVFA shall provide
a report detailing the strategies and actions taken to maximize
revenues from non-general fund sources and cost savings strategies.
Sec. 508. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
private revenues held by the MVH on a nonfiduciary basis for a
resident member of a veterans' facility are appropriated to pay
medical expenses, member assessments, and other expenses incurred
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


by that resident member. Any unexpended or unencumbered private
revenues held on a nonfiduciary basis by the MVH at the close of
the fiscal year do not lapse to the general fund and must be
carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.
Sec. 509. Not later than January 15 , the MVFA shall provide a
report on the construction, operation, and finances of the new
Marquette veterans home funded in article 14 of 2022 PA 166.
Sec. 510. Except as otherwise provided by law, any unexpended
and unencumbered federal revenues received by the MVFA do not lapse
to the state general fund and must be carried forward into the
subsequent fiscal year.
Sec. 511. The department, with the approval of the state
budget office, is authorized to realign federal revenues sources of
the MVFA. This realignment of federal fund sourcing must not
produce a gross increase or decrease in the total authorization for
the individual MVFA line-item appropriations. The department shall
provide a quarterly report to the standard report recipients on
actions taken under this section.

CAPITAL OUTLAY
Sec. 601. (1) The department shall provide for the acquisition
and disposition of National Guard armories, facilities, and lands
as provided under sections 368, 382, and 382a of the Michigan
military act, 1967 PA 150, MCL 32.768, 32.782, and 32.782a.
(2) The department shall provide a listing of property sales
and acquisitions annually.
Sec. 602. (1) The appropriations for armory maintenance and
special maintenance - National Guard must be expended in accordance
with the requirements of sections 302 and 305 and must be expended
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


according to the maintenance priorities of the department to repair
and modernize military training sites and support facilities,
including armories.
(2) Not later than January 15, the department shall provide a
report providing information on the status, projected costs, and
projected completion date of current and planned special
maintenance projects at the armories and other National Guard
facilities funded from capital outlay appropriations made in part 1
and in previous fiscal years.
Sec. 603. (1) The appropriations for special maintenance –
veterans' facility must be expended in accordance with the
requirements of section 502 and must be expended according to the
maintenance priorities of the MVFA to repair and modernize the
state's veterans' facility, which may include physical plant
expansions, renovations, or enhancements, and other projects
designed to enhance the quality of life and medical care of
resident members.
(2) Not later than January 15, the MVH shall provide a report
providing information on the status, projected costs, and projected
completion date of current and planned special maintenance projects
at each veterans' facility funded from capital outlay
appropriations made in part 1 and in previous fiscal years.
PART 2A
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026

GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 1201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1A is
$152,000,000.00 and total state spending from state sources under
part 1A to be paid to local units of government is $0.00.
Sec. 1202. The appropriations under this part and part 1A are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.

DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS
Sec. 1301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1A for Selfridge Air
National Guard Base must be used to support costs of runway
encroachment solutions while complying with air installation
compatible use zone program recommendations, including, but not
limited to, all of the following:
(a) Capital improvements necessary to shift the runway to the
north and repair the airfield and nonairfield features of the base
and surrounding community impacted by the shift.
(b) Infrastructure projects including, but not limited to,
roadways repairs, vehicle access to the base and to the museum,
stormwater drain and culvert repairs and modernization, force
protection features, airfield features, and taxiway extensions.
(2) Unexpended funds appropriated in part 1A for Selfridge Air
National Guard Base are designated as a work project appropriation.
Unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the
fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures under this
section until the project has been completed. The following is in
compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984
PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to support costs of runway
encroachment solutions.
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees, contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is
$152,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2027.
Sec. 1302. (1) The department shall identify 1 or more of the
following methods for funding Selfridge Air National Guard Base
under part 1A:
(a) Unobligated work project account balances associated with
the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund created in
section 4 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.254,
or other lapsed account balances determined by the state budget
director.
(b) Unobligated general fund/general purpose or federal
appropriations that are eligible to support Selfridge Air National
Guard Base infrastructure improvements.
(c) Special obligation bond financing through the Michigan
strategic fund created in section 5 of the Michigan strategic fund
act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2005.
(2) The department must make every effort to fully utilize the
funding options and available revenues identified in subsection
(1). After identifying 1 or more of the funding sources under
subsection (1) and amounts available from those funding sources
that will be used to support Selfridge Air National Guard Base, the
department shall identify any remaining costs.
(3) Pursuant to section 352 of the management and budget act,
1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352, there is appropriated from the
countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund created
under section 351 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431,
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s


MCL 18.1351, an amount equal to the amount identified by the
department under subsection (2) to support remaining costs for
Selfridge Air National Guard Base appropriated in part 1A. The
annual growth rate for the current calendar year was estimated to
be less than 0% at the most recent consensus revenue estimating
conference.
Final Page
STM S06114'26 (S-1) 1emz5s